apertium-cat-srd.srd.dix
    <pardef n="b/àlere__vblex" c="p.49">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aler</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>àlere</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>àlere</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantare"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>alendi</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>alendi</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>alende</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alende</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>àgio</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ales</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alet</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alimus</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alides</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alent</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>alia</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alias</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aliat</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alìamus</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aliais</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alialt</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>àgia</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>àgias</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>àgiat</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agiamus</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agiais</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>àgiant</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>alere</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aleres</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aleret</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aleremus</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alereis</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alerent</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ale</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ale</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>àgiat</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agiamus</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alide</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>àgiant</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>àlidu</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>àlida</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>àlidos</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>àlidas</l><r>àlere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bàlere"><i>b</i><par n="b/àlere__vblex"/></e>
